Alaska statutes. Title 23. Labor and Workers’ Compensation.
Revisor’s notes. —

The provisions of this title were redrafted in 1984 to remove personal pronouns pursuant to § 4, ch. 58, SLA 1982, and in 1984, 1990, 1996, 2008, and 2016 to make other minor word changes.

Administrative Code. —

For labor and workforce development, see 8 AAC.

For labor relations, see 8 AAC, part 9.